North Dakota, session 69, SB2354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. The new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code,
as created by House Bill No. 1160, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly, is amended and
reenacted as follows:
Personal electronic devices - Prohibition during instructional time.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Instructional time" means the time from the start of the school day until dismissal at the
end of the school day on school premises, for which the signal may be the ringing of a
bell, including a structured or unstructured learning experience, recess, a lunch period,
and time in between classes. The term does not include private student travel time to and
from an area career and technology center or other offsite learning experience or
instructional time occurring in virtual environments off school premises.
b. "Parent" means a parent or guardian of a student who is authorized to make decisions
regarding education for the student.
c. "Personal electronic communication device" means a portable electronic device capable
of communication by voice, text, or other data with one or more other parties or devices,
or capable of connection to a smartphone, the internet, or a cellular or wireless fidelity
network, including a smartphone, cell phone, bluetooth-enabled device, tablet,
smartwatch or other wearable device, and gaming device. The term does not include:
(1) School-owned devices provided to a student and school-approved devices used by
a student in accordance with this section.
(2) Portable devices that meet the definition of a medical device under the federal
Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 9 et seq.].
d. "School" means a public school providing prekindergarten, elementary, or secondary
education, including area career and technology centers. The term does not include
virtual schools, virtual instruction, the North Dakota center for distance education, or
education occurring in a home-school environment.
e. "School-related activity" means a school sanctioned activity, event, or function, occurring
outside of instructional time, at which students are under supervision of the school,
whether on or off school premises, including a bus ride, field trip, sporting event, and
school dance.
f. "Student" means an individual currently enrolled or registered at a school as defined
under subdivision d of this section .

S. B. NO. 2354 - PAGE 2
2. Each school district or applicable governing body shall adopt and implement a policy for
schools which:
a. Requires all personal electronic communication devices be silenced or turned off,
securely lockedstowed away, and inaccessible to students during instructional time;
b. Ensures students do not have access to personal electronic communication devices, by
requiring the devices to be locked or stowed away in a secure lockable pouch, phone
locker, pencil pouch, manila envelope, or other inaccessible location;
c. Provides schools may limit or allow student access to personal electronic communication
devices outside of instructional time, during a school-related activity;
d.c. Includes enforcement provisions to ensure strict compliance with the policy by students
and school employees; and
e.d. Provides a student may contact the student's parent or authorized caregiver during the
school day if needed by using a school telephone made available to the student in a
manner and location designated by the school.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a school may not prohibit a student from possessing or using a
personal electronic communication device, if:
a. A medical provider licensed under title 43 determines the possession or use of a
personal electronic communication device is necessary for the health or well-being of the
student; or
b. The possession or use of a personal electronic communication device is required by the
student's individual education program under the:
(1) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act [Pub. L. 91-230; 84 Stat. 121;
20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.], a plan under section;
(2) Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [29 U.S.C. 794], or other; or
(3) A plan that must be accommodateddeveloped in accordance with state or federal
law requiring accommodation.
4. A school district shall collect data annually with the goal of measuring the impact of its policy
on student behavior, mental health, disciplinary incidents, school attendance, and academic
performance. By July 1, 2026, the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a uniform
system to enable a school district to report all data as required under this section.
5. Upon the adoption and implementation of a policy in accordance with this section, a school
district shall:
a. Ensure the policy is communicated to students, parents, and authorized caregivers; and
b. Publish the policy in student and personnel handbooks.

S. B. NO. 2354 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2354.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 73 Nays 17 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State